Texas, session 892, HB54.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 601, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 601.012 to read as follows: Sec. 601.012.  CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED FOR CERTAIN PUBLIC OFFICES AND ADVISORY BOARD OR TASK FORCE MEMBERSHIPS. (a) A person must be a United States citizen to be appointed to or serve in a public office, including on the governing body of a commission, board, or other agency, or on an advisory board or task force: (1)  within the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government; or (2)  of a political subdivision of this state. (b)  Subsection (a) does not apply to an office for which the federal or state constitution prescribes exclusive qualification requirements. SECTION 2.  Section 601.012, Government Code, as added by this Act, applies to an appointment that occurs on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  The term of office of a person who is not a United States citizen who was appointed to or served in a public office or on an advisory board or task force before the effective date of this Act, that is subject to Section 601.012, Government Code, as added by this Act, ends on that date, unless the person becomes a United States citizen on or before that date. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.